Utah statutes.
53A-24-202.   Creation.

There is hereby created within the Utah State Office of Rehabilitation a Division of Rehabilitation Services, which is under the policy direction of the board and under the direction and general supervision of the executive director.



Enacted by Chapter 83, 1988 General Session

